Oklahoma, session 2025, SB436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 15 O.S. 2021, Section 754, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 754. Nothing in the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act
shall apply to:
1. Publishers, broadcasters, printers, or other persons insofar
as an unlawful practice as defined in Section 753 of this title
involves information that has been disseminated or reproduced on
behalf of others without knowledge that it is an unlawful practice;
2. Actions or transactions regulated required or authorized
under specific laws or regulations administered by the Corporation
Commission or any other regulatory body or officer acting under
statutory authority of this state or the United States, or to acts
done by retailers or other persons acting in good faith on the basis

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB436 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of i nformation or matter supplied by others and without knowledge of
the deceptive character of such information or matter; and
3. The collection of monies denominated as gross receipts tax
on mixed beverages, sales tax or use tax, or asserted injuries or
damages that are monies that have been collected as, or denominated
as, gross receipts tax on mixed beverages, sales tax or use tax, and
which have been remitted to the Oklahoma Tax Commission or other
governmental taxing authority.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
February 20, 2025 - DO PASS














SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB436 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)